Vermont statutes. Title 9 Commerce and Trade
Chapter 82. Scrap Metal Processors

§ 3021.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

[Repealed.]

“Ferrous scrap” means any scrap metal consisting primarily of iron, steel, or both, including large manufactured articles such as automobile bodies that may contain other substances to be removed and sorted during normal processing operations of scrap metal.

“Metal article” means any manufactured item consisting of metal that is usable for its originally intended purpose without processing, repair, or alteration, including railings, copper or aluminum wire, copper pipe and tubing, bronze cemetery plaques, urns, markers, plumbing fixtures, and cast-iron radiators.

“Nonferrous scrap” means any scrap metal consisting primarily of metal other than iron or steel, and does not include aluminum beverage cans, post-consumer household items, items removed during building renovations or demolitions, or large manufactured items containing small quantities of nonferrous metals such as automobile bodies and appliances.

“Proprietary article” means any of the following:

Any metal article stamped, engraved, stenciled, or marked as being or having been the property of a governmental entity, public utility, or a transportation, shipbuilding, ship repair, mining, or manufacturing company.

Any hard-drawn copper electrical conductor, cable, or wire greater than 0.375 inches in diameter, stranded or solid.

Any aluminum conductor, cable, or wire greater than 0.75 inches in diameter, stranded or solid.

Metal beer kegs.

Manhole covers.

Catalytic converters.

“Scrap metal” means any manufactured item or article that contains metal.

“Scrap metal processor” means:

a salvage yard, as defined in

24 V.S.A. § 2241(7)

; or

a person engaged in the business of purchasing ferrous scrap, nonferrous scrap, metal articles, or proprietary articles, whether for resale or for processing into raw material products consisting of prepared grades.

“Scrap metal processor” does not include:

a salvage yard described in

24 V.S.A. § 2248(e)

; or

a salvage yard or salvage dealer that only accepts or dismantles motor vehicles and flattens or crushes the motor vehicles for transportation to a scrap metal processor.

“Railroad scrap” means any scrap metal consisting primarily of the steel components used in rolling stock and railroad tracks, including rails, joint bars, tie plates, anchors, turnouts, frogs, and spikes. “Railroad scrap” also includes railroad signals and signal components.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

2011, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 27.

§ 3022.
Purchase of nonferrous scrap, metal articles, proprietary articles, and railroad scrap.

[Repealed.]

A scrap metal processor may purchase nonferrous scrap, metal articles, proprietary articles, and railroad scrap only if the scrap metal processor complies with all the following procedures:

At the time of sale, the processor:

requires the seller to provide a current government-issued photographic identification that indicates the seller’s full name, current address, and date of birth, and records in a permanent ledger the identification information of the seller, the time and date of the transaction, the license number of the seller’s vehicle, and a description of the items received from the seller; and

requests and, if available, collects documentation from the seller of the items offered for sale, such as a bill of sale, receipt, letter of authorization, or similar evidence that establishes that the seller lawfully owns the items to be sold.

After purchasing an item from a person who fails to provide documentation pursuant to subdivision (1)(B) of this subsection, the processor:

submits to the Department of Public Safety no later than the close of the following business day a report that describes the item and the seller’s identifying information required in subdivision (1)(A) of this subsection; and

holds the item for at least 10 days following purchase.

The information collected by a scrap metal processor pursuant to this section shall be retained for at least five years at the processor’s normal place of business or other readily accessible and secure location. On request, this information shall be made available to any law enforcement official or authorized security agent of a governmental entity who provides official credentials at the scrap metal processor’s business location during regular business hours.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 10; amended

2011, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 1, eff. May 18, 2012;

2013, No. 167

(Adj. Sess.), § 28.

§ 3023.
Penalties.

A scrap metal processor who violates any provision of this chapter for the first time may be assessed a civil penalty not to exceed $1,000.00 for each transaction.

A scrap metal processor who violates any provision of this chapter for a second or subsequent time shall be fined not more than $25,000.00 for each transaction.

HISTORY:

Added

2007, No. 195

(Adj. Sess.), § 10.